Washington statutes.
RCW 36.38.020

Optional provisions in ordinance.

In addition to the provisions levying and fixing the amount of tax, the ordinance may contain any or all of the following provisions:

(1) A provision defining the words and terms used therein;

(2) A provision requiring the price (exclusive of the tax to be paid by the person paying for admission) at which every admission ticket or card is sold to be conspicuously and indelibly printed or written on the face or back of that part of the ticket which is to be taken up by the management of the place for which an admission charge is exacted, and making the violation of such provision a misdemeanor punishable by fine of not exceeding one hundred dollars;

(3) Provisions fixing reasonable exemptions from such tax;

(4) Provisions allowing as an offset against the tax, the amount of like taxes levied, fixed, and collected within their jurisdiction by incorporated cities and towns in the county;

(5) A provision requiring persons receiving payments for admissions taxed under said ordinance to collect the amount of the tax from the persons making such payments;

(6) A provision to the effect that the tax imposed by said ordinance shall be deemed to be held in trust by the person required to collect the same until paid to the county treasurer, and making it a misdemeanor for any person receiving payment of the tax and appropriating or converting the same to his or her own use or to any use other than the payment of the tax as provided in said ordinance to the extent that the amount of such tax is not available for payment on the due date for filing returns as provided in said ordinance;

(7) A provision that in case any person required by the ordinance to collect the tax imposed thereby fails to collect the same, or having collected the tax fails to pay the same to the county treasurer in the manner prescribed by the ordinance, whether such failure is the result of such person's own acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond such person's control, such person shall nevertheless be personally liable to the county for the amount of the tax;

(8) Provisions fixing the time when the taxes imposed by the ordinance shall be due and payable to the county treasurer; requiring persons receiving payments for admissions to make periodic returns to the county treasurer on such forms and setting forth such information as the county treasurer may specify; requiring such return to show the amount of tax upon admissions for which such person is liable for specified preceding periods, and requiring such person to sign and transmit the same to the county treasurer together with a remittance for the amount;

(9) A provision requiring taxpayers to file with the county treasurer verified annual returns setting forth such additional information as he or she may deem necessary to determine tax liability correctly;

(10) A provision to the effect that whenever a certificate of registration, if required by the ordinance, is obtained for operating or conducting temporary places of amusement by persons who are not the owners, lessees, or custodians of the building, lot or place where the amusement is to be conducted, or whenever the business is permitted to be conducted without the procurement of a certificate, the tax imposed shall be returned and paid as provided in the ordinance by such owner, lessee, or custodian, unless paid by the person conducting the place of amusement;

(11) A provision requiring the applicant for a temporary certificate of registration, if required by the ordinance, to furnish with the application therefor, the name and address of the owner, lessee, or custodian of the premises upon which the amusement is to be conducted, and requiring the county treasurer to notify such owner, lessee, or custodian of the issuance of any such temporary certificate, and of the joint liability for such tax;

(12) A provision empowering the county treasurer to declare the tax upon temporary or itinerant places of amusement to be immediately due and payable and to collect the same, when he or she believes there is a possibility that the tax imposed under the ordinance will not be otherwise paid;

(13) Any or all of the applicable general administrative provisions contained in RCW 82.32.010 through 82.32.340 and 82.32.380, and the amendments thereto, except that unless otherwise indicated by the context of said sections, in all provisions so incorporated in such ordinance (a) the term "county treasurer" (of the county enacting said ordinance) shall be substituted for each reference made in said sections to the "department," the "department of revenue," "any employee of the department," or "director of the department of revenue"; (b) the name of the county enacting such ordinance shall be substituted for each reference made in said sections to the "state" or to the "state of Washington"; (c) the term "this ordinance" shall be substituted for each reference made in said sections to "this chapter"; (d) the name of the county enacting said ordinance shall be substituted for each reference made in said sections to "Thurston county"; and (e) the term "board of county commissioners" shall be substituted for each reference made in said sections to the "director of financial management."

[ 2009 c 549 s 4080; 1979 c 151 s 38; 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 21; 1963 c 4 s 36.38.020. Prior: 1943 c 269 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 11241-12.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 278: See notes following RCW 11.08.160.